Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1204
Lien; priority.

A lien created under section 52-1201 shall have its priority established by the date and time of filing and shall not be prior to a properly attached and perfected lien or security interest created under the Uniform Commercial Code unless such priority shall be agreed upon in writing by the prior attached and perfected lienholder or secured party.

Laws 1985, LB 503, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 54, § 21.